NOMINATIONS  TO  THE  DEPARTMENT  OF 

TRANSPORTATION

S.  HRG.  109–232

HEARING

BEFORE THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

APRIL  26,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

25–226 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2006

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on April 26, 2005 ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Allen .....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye ..................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator McCain .................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Cino, Maria, Deputy Secretary-Designate, Department of Transportation ........
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Biographical information .................................................................................
Clinton, Hon. Hillary Rodham, U.S. Senator from New York .............................
Scheinberg,  Phyllis  F.,  Assistant  Secretary  of  Transportation  for  Budget  and 

Programs/Chief Financial Officer-Designate, Department of Transportation
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Biographical information .................................................................................

Response to Written Questions Submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to: 

Maria Cino ........................................................................................................
Phyllis F. Scheinberg .......................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Page 
1
5
3
3
2
2
1
7

7
9
9
4

13
13
14

27
29

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

NOMINATIONS  TO  THE  DEPARTMENT  OF 

TRANSPORTATION 

TUESDAY,  APRIL  26,  2005

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10:03  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,
Chairman of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The  CHAIRMAN.  While  we  are  waiting  for  our  Co-Chairman,  let 
me  thank  you  all  for  coming.  Perhaps  we  could  have  an  oppor-
tunity  to  have  the  two  nominees  introduce  their  family  who  are 
here. Ms. Scheinberg, would you like to tell us who is with you for 
the record today. 

Ms.  SCHEINBERG.  Thank  you,  Senator.  I  would  like  to  introduce: 
my  father,  Jacob  Factor;  my  husband,  David  Turner;  and  my  son, 
Eric Turner. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  It  is  nice  to  have  you 

Ms. Cino, I understand you have——
Ms. CINO. I have my Northern Virginia family here. 
The CHAIRMAN. It is a notorious family you brought with you this 

here. 

morning. 

[Laughter.] 
Ms. CINO. Yes, sir, I have been told. 
But I have my two godchildren here, Mattie and Emma Carville. 
The CHAIRMAN. Good morning, thank you. 
Ms.  CINO.  And  many  members  of  my  wonderful  friends  that  are 
here  to  support  me  and  have  really  been  responsible  for  me  being 
here. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Jim  and  Mary,  we  are  happy  to  have  you  here.  It  is  nice  of  you 

We  want  to  wait  just  a  second  here  for  Dan  if  we  can.  I  would 
say for the record that we are meeting today on short notice on the 
nominations  of  Mario  Cino  and  Phyllis  Scheinberg.  The  President 
nominated Mario Cino to be Deputy Secretary of Transportation on 
April  6th  and  Ms.  Scheinberg  was  nominated  on  April  14th.  Each 
has  come  to  us  with  tremendous  recommendations  and  there  has 
been an expression of urgency that we proceed with these nomina-
tions. 

to come. 

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

2

Senator Inouye is on the way, John. But do you have a statement 

to make first? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN MCCAIN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARIZONA 

Senator  MCCAIN.  I  am  sure  that  our  distinguished  Senators 
Allen  and  Clinton  will  say  whatever  is  necessary.  I  would  like  to 
say, Mr. Chairman, if we are waiting for Senator Inouye, that I do 
happen  to  know  both  nominees  and  I  think  they  are  highly  quali-
fied.  I  also  think,  if  I  could  mention  Ms.  Scheinberg  in  particular, 
she has done some outstanding work on pipeline safety, on Amtrak, 
on  a  number  of  other  issues  that  I  think  have  been  really,  really 
enormously  helpful  to  the  work  of  this  Committee,  and  I  welcome 
both nominees. 

I thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Yes, I would join that. I read through your back-
ground and the statements you filed, and the enormous number of 
reports that you are responsible for over the years. It is just some-
thing else. 

We  are  waiting  for  Senator  Inouye.  Senator,  would  you  like  to 

make any comments? 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  If  I  may.  I  would  just  like  to  say  that  I 
thank  you  for  holding  this  hearing  on  these  two  important  posi-
tions.  I  am  concerned  about  the  Administration’s  transportation 
policy. First, the administration for the first time during war years 
decided  to  reduce  revenues  by  ordering  tax  breaks  for  the  wealthi-
est  among  us.  That  of  course  then  makes  less  funds  available  for 
other  projects  that  require  some  attention.  Faced  with  record  defi-
cits, the Bush tax cut forces us to slash programs that middle class 
families  depend  on  every  day,  including  transportation  programs. 
There can be no mistake about it. Americans are totally depend-
ent  on  transportation—our  country  built  its  economy  and  its  cul-
ture  on  our  national  transportation  system,  which  includes  high-
ways,  waterways,  railroads,  and  airports.  Security  and  safety  are 
among the most paramount things in all of these modes. 

The federal leadership and support of our national transportation 
system  helps  commuters,  students,  businesses,  everybody  in  our 
country.  In  short,  federal  transportation  programs  make  our  Na-
tion  safer,  more  secure,  and  more  prosperous.  To  shortchange  fed-
eral transportation programs in these areas I think would be a ter-
rible mistake. 

Instead of making the investments that would improve our trans-
portation  system,  it  has  been  proposed  that  $119  billion  less  be 
spent  on  our  country’s  surface  transportation  system,  the  amount 
needed  to  maintain  the  status  quo,  and  that  is  according  to  U.S. 
DOT.  In  addition,  the  President’s  2006  budget  proposal  calls  for 
bankrupting  our  passenger  rail  system.  To  do  this  in  the  wake  of 
9/11,  when  that  was  the  one  mode  of  transportation  that  worked 
when our aviation system was shut down, is outrageous. 

The  administration  continues,  I  think,  to  risk  the  safety  and  se-
curity  of  air  travelers  by  pursuing  the  outsourcing  and  privatiza-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

3

tion  of  air  traffic  control  and  aviation  security  functions.  Did  we 
not  learn  anything  from  9/11,  when  the  terrorists  were  able  to 
board  planes  with  deadly  weapons?  When  it  comes  to  airline  secu-
rity, we have got to put passengers first. 

We  take  our  highways,  our  rail  system,  and  our  airports  for 
granted.  But  the  future  efficiency  and  safety  of  our  transportation 
systems  are  not  guaranteed  unless  we  provide  the  leadership  in 
building a national transportation system for the 21st century. 

If  present  trends  continue,  freight  traffic  on  our  highways  will 
double,  adding  lots  more  trucks  to  our  roads.  Commuters  will 
spend  more  time  stuck  in  traffic  and  as  highway  congestion  be-
comes commonplace in more places we are going to have more pol-
lution  resulting.  The  lines  and  delays  at  airports  are  going  to  get 
worse. 

If  we  follow  the  course  laid  out  by  the  Administration,  we  are 
looking  at  gridlock  on  our  roads  and  on  our  airport  runways  and 
few  choices  for  travelers.  I  travel  by  air  frequently  between  here 
and  home  and  often  we  are  stuck  at  the  airport  waiting  for  traffic 
to clear. We have narrowed the separation between airplanes to try 
and accommodate more airplanes in the sky and to suddenly think 
that  we  can  be  better  off  without  our  national  passenger  railroad 
system just does not make sense. 

It is a grim picture. I know many of my colleagues share my con-

cerns and I hope we can make a difference. 

I thank our witnesses for being here today, for their intention to 
help  move  transportation  concerns  further  along  with  our  needs.  I 
look forward to working with them. 

Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Senator  Inouye,  do  you  have  any  comments  to 

make? 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator  INOUYE.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  thank  you  very  much.  I  wish 
to  congratulate  our  two  ladies,  Ms.  Scheinberg  and  Ms.  Cino,  and 
welcome  our  colleagues.  I  have  a  prepared  statement  I  would  like 
to make part of the record. 

The CHAIRMAN. Without objection, it will be put in the record. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Good  Morning,  Ms.  Cino  and  Ms.  Scheinberg.  Thank  you  for  appearing  before  us 
as  we  consider  your  nominations  to  become  Deputy  Secretary  of  the  Department  of 
Transportation  and  Assistant  Secretary  for  Budget  and  Programs  and  Chief  Finan-
cial Officer to the Department of Transportation, respectively. 

I look forward to hearing your views of how your past experiences will assist you 

in addressing the challenges posed by these positions. 

Ms. Cino, we are depending on you to offer steady leadership at the Department, 
and  to  make  certain  that  the  safety  of  our  nation’s  transportation  system  remains 
the top priority at the agency. 

At  the  same  time,  you  must  provide  the  necessary  guidance  to  develop  and  ad-
vance credible concepts to enhance the national transportation system and improve 
the movement of goods and people across the United States. 

I  am  extremely  concerned  by  the  Administration’s  funding  plans  for  the  nation’s 
aviation  programs  in  recent  years.  The  Federal  Aviation  Administration  (FAA)  has 
seen massive cuts to their Facilities and Equipment (F&E) account since Fiscal Year 
(FY)  2004,  which  will  place  our  international  leadership  in  the  realm  of  aerospace 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

4

in  jeopardy  and  damage  our  ability  to  address  the  pending  capacity  and  congestion 
crisis in our skies. 

Along with proposed reductions to the Airport Improvement Program (AIP), Presi-
dent  Bush  has  cut  more  than  $1  billion  in  critical  aviation  funding  in  the  past  two 
years. You must provide direction at the Department to make certain aviation needs 
are properly funded. 

I  am  also  concerned  about  the  lack  of  compromise  that  has  delayed  important 
transportation  laws.  Currently,  Congress  is  working  to  pass  the  highway  funding 
legislation, but we have been stuck in this log jam since last Congress. I believe we 
could  have  passed  a  good  bill  that  would  have  provided  crucial  funding  and  impor-
tant  job  opportunities  if  the  Administration  would  show  flexibility  and  provide  the 
needed guidance to get this done. 

Similarly, the Department’s radical Amtrak reauthorization plan and budget pro-
posal to bankrupt the railroad, developed without consultation with our Committee, 
suggests  that  the  Administration  is  more  interested  in  making  grand  statements 
than sincerely working with the Congress to improve intercity passenger rail service 
in our country. I believe, and I hope you agree, that building the bridges of commu-
nication with the legislative branch is an essential task of every nominee. 

The  position  for  which  you  are  nominated  will  be  particularly  important  in  the 
immediate  future,  especially  as  we  work  toward  domestic  and  international  agree-
ments  in  various  aspects  of  aviation.  We  need  someone  who  will  work  with  Con-
gress. 

Ms.  Scheinberg,  you  also  have  a  great  task  before  you  as  fiscal  belt  tightening  is 
occurring  across  the  Federal  Government  while  the  nation’s  transportation  system 
has greater funding needs than ever. 

Again,  thank  you  for  appearing  before  us  today.  I  look  forward  to  hearing  your 

testimony.

The  CHAIRMAN.  Senator  Clinton,  we  would  be  pleased  to  have 

you introduce Ms. Cino. 

STATEMENT OF HON. HILLARY RODHAM CLINTON,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW YORK 

Senator  CLINTON.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  and  thanks  to  you 
and  Senator  Inouye,  Senator  McCain,  and  Senator  Lautenberg  for 
allowing  me  to  come  today  and  introduce  a  native  New  Yorker  to 
you. 

Mary  Cino  is  currently  serving  as  Counselor  to  the  Secretary  of 
Transportation  and  she  has  been  nominated  by  the  President  to 
serve as the Deputy Secretary of Transportation. She was born and 
raised  in  Buffalo,  New  York,  which  is  one  of  the  greatest  cities  in 
the  country.  She  is  a  graduate  of  St.  John  Fisher  College  in  Roch-
ester,  New  York,  another  great  city  in  upstate  New  York,  and  she 
worked  for  years  for  former  Congressman  Bill  Paxon,  eventually 
becoming  his  chief  of  staff.  She  has  recently  served  as  Assistant 
Secretary  and  Director  General  of  the  United  States  and  Foreign 
Commercial Service at the U.S. Department of Commerce. 

As  you  consider  her  nomination,  I  know  the  Committee  has  sev-
eral important policy matters that are before you. Senator Lauten-
berg  referred  to  some  of  them.  The  Department  of  Transportation 
is the key agency responsible for overseeing the formulation of na-
tional  transportation  policy  and  promoting  intermodal  transpor-
tation across our Nation. This is an important job at any time, but 
I  think  it  is  particularly  crucial  at  this  moment  in  our  country’s 
history. 

Mary  Cino  comes  with  a  lot  of  energy,  a  lot  of  intelligence,  and 
certainly a great network of friends and extended family. She intro-
duced  James  Carville  and  Mary  Matalin  and  their  daughters 
Mattie and Emma, who are her goddaughters. She has a great de-
sire to serve in public service. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

5

I am very concerned about a lot of the issues that she will be re-
sponsible  for  dealing  with  and  I  hope  that  as  we  consider  the  new 
transportation bill that will be before the Senate this week we will 
consider  the  role  of  national  passenger  rail,  we  will  consider  the 
possibility  of  being  visionary  enough  to  look  at  high-speed  rail.  It 
would  be  a  great  boon  to  upstate  New  York  to  have  high-speed 
train  between  Cleveland  and  Buffalo,  between  Buffalo  and  New 
York City. 

I  also  hope  that  we  will  look  at  some  of  the  aviation  issues.  Mr. 
Chairman,  the  New  York  TRACON  is  one  of  the  busiest  air  traffic 
control facilities in the Nation and the number of errors have been 
reported  to  be  increasing  due  to  increased  demand  on  the  control-
lers.  As  someone  who  flies  in  and  out  of  New  York  airports  every 
single  week,  I  am  very  concerned  and  will  continue  to  work  with 
the Department of Transportation, the FAA, and this Committee to 
make  sure  that  air  travel  is  safe  in  the  air  as  well  as  when  we 
board our planes because of the increased need for security. 

I  hope  the  Committee  will  also  work  with  Ms.  Cino  and  the  De-
partment of Transportation to ensure that Essential Air Service re-
mains funded. It is designed to provide air service to small isolated 
communities  and,  although  I  know  many  of  my  colleagues,  when 
you  think  of  New  York,  you  think  of  Manhattan,  but  it  has  huge 
areas  of  isolation  and  sparse  population  and  essential  air  service 
in  the  north  country  near  Fort  Drum,  as  well  as  in  western  New 
York  near  Buffalo,  where  Ms.  Cino  grew  up,  is  very  important  to 
our continuing economic prosperity. 

Also,  going  hand  in  hand  with  that  is  the  plans  recently  an-
nounced  to  close  air  traffic  control  facilities.  Towers  at  the  greater 
Rochester,  Albany,  and  Syracuse  Hancock  International  Airports 
could  be  potentially  impacted,  which  would  close  control  towers 
from  midnight  to  5  a.m.,  which  would  have  consequences  for  avia-
tion across our state. 

So it is exciting to see someone from New York, who understands 
these problems, being nominated for this important position. I look 
forward  to  working  with  you  on  the  Committee  and,  should  Ms. 
Cino  be  confirmed,  working  with  her  to  deal  with  so  many  of  the 
issues that are important to New York and America. 

I  thank  you  for  the  courtesy  of  allowing  me  to  appear.  Thank 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Senator  Allen,  would  you 

introduce  Ms. 

you. 

Scheinberg, please. 

STATEMENT OF HON. GEORGE ALLEN,

U.S. SENATOR FROM VIRGINIA 

Senator ALLEN. Thank you. Mr. Chairman, Senator Inouye, Sen-
ator McCain, Senator Lautenberg: I am here to introduce two high-
ly  qualified  Virginians  who  have  been  nominated  to  serve  at  the 
Department  of  Transportation.  Both  have  distinguished  careers  in 
public service and will help tackle the daunting tasks and problems 
that face our Nation’s transportation system. 

Let me first start with Maria Cino. She may be from Buffalo, as 
are  Jack  Kemp,  Jim  Kelly,  Bruce  Smith  at  one  time  and  Marv 
Levy,  but  I  am  glad  she  moved  to  Virginia.  I  will  not  list  all  Vir-
ginia transportation priorities other than to say I am glad that she 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

6

is  in  Virginia  and  will  have  to  cross  over  bridges,  understands  the 
importance  of  high-speed  rail,  and  we  are  happy  to  work  with  her 
to re-open Reagan National Airport to general aviation, an issue for 
this Committee. 

Senator MCCAIN. These are issues for the Committee. 
Senator  ALLEN.  Excuse  me?  They  are.  I  have  a  bill  and  I  know 
you will all be supportive of it, and I do not think it is actually the 
Department of Transportation that is the problem. 

My relationship and friendship with Maria go back to 1991 when 
she  was  chief  of  staff  to  Bill  Paxon.  She  has  worked  in  a  number 
of  positions  in  the  private  as  well  as  public  sector.  As  was  stated 
by Senator Clinton, she was appointed by President Bush and also 
confirmed  by  the  U.S.  Senate  as  Assistant  Secretary  and  Director 
General of the U.S. and Foreign Commercial Service. In that role—
it  is  important  to  understand  the  management  and  the  responsi-
bility  in  that  role—she  managed  a  worldwide  group  that  helped 
small and medium-sized businesses export their product or provide 
their  services  abroad  and  also  sought  to  protect  our  small  busi-
nesses overseas. 

She  oversaw  and  distributed  an  annual  budget  of  $200  million 
and  supervised  1,700  employees  at  105  domestic  offices  and  162 
international  offices.  While  at  Commerce,  where  showing  good 
management  and  making  sure  you  have  a  capable,  skilled  work 
force are so important, she worked to create the professional devel-
opment  department  to  provide  consistent  and  ongoing  training  for 
headquarters, domestic, and international staff. 

She  also  has  worked  in  the  private  sector  as  a  public  policy  and 
government  affairs  consultant  to  the  law  firm  of  Wiley  Rein  and 
Fielding  in  Washington,  DC.  During  this  time  she  used  her  man-
agement,  legislative  and  political  experience  to  represent  corpora-
tions  and  trade  associations  on  a  wide  range  of  issues  before  Con-
gress. 

I  have  worked  with  her  over  the  years  and  I  can  say  to  my  col-
leagues  she  is  an  outstanding  individual.  She  has  strong  manage-
ment  skills.  She  has  a  good,  calm  head  on  her  shoulders  and  she 
gets  the  job  done.  I  think  with  her  cheerful  personality  and  suc-
cessful  leadership,  Maria  Cino  will  be  an  outstanding  Deputy  Sec-
retary of Transportation. 

It is also my pleasure to introduce and present to the Committee 
Phyllis  Scheinberg  as  the  nominee  for  Assistant  Secretary  for 
Budget  and  Programs  and  Chief  Financial  Officer  at  the  Depart-
ment  of  Transportation.  Phyllis  has  also  served  in  a  number  of 
roles  in  government.  She  comes  to  this  nomination  as  the  Deputy 
Assistant  Secretary  of  Transportation  for  Budget  and  Programs, 
overseeing the development and presentation of the Department of 
Transportation’s budget requirements. 

the  Department  of  Transportation,  Ms. 
Scheinberg  was  the  Director  of  Transportation  Issues  at  the  Gen-
eral  Accounting  Office,  where  she  directed  reports,  testimony,  and 
briefings on a multitude of surface transportation issues. In this ca-
pacity,  she  testified  before  Congress  on  topics  including  the  finan-
cial viability of Amtrak—I know that is a key concern of this Com-
mittee, particularly to Senator McCain—and also on a particularly 
relevant topic today, the reauthorization of TEA–21. 

joining 

Prior 

to 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

7

Before  working  on  transportation  issues  at  GAO,  Phyllis  served 
as  a  Senior  Budget  Examiner  for  Transportation  and  Natural  Re-
sources  at  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget.  She  originally 
came  to  Washington,  DC,  as  a  presidential  management  intern  in 
1979. 

She has been a resident of the Commonwealth of Virginia for 26 
years. She and her husband David Turner live in North Arlington. 
Both  her  children,  Diane  and  Eric,  attend  public  schools.  Eric  is 
currently  a  student  at  the  Thomas  Jefferson  High  School  for 
Science  and  Technology.  She  also  recruited  her  80-year-old  father 
to move to Virginia as well. 

So,  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you  for  holding  a  hearing  in  a  prompt 
manner on these two outstanding, exceptional, well qualified nomi-
nees who have shown good judgment. They could live in a lot of dif-
ferent  places  when  coming  to  this  region.  Both  chose  wisely  in 
going to Virginia. 

Thank you very much. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Senator. 
Without  objection,  I  will  print  the  statement  I  would  have  made 
at  the  beginning  of  the  hearing  and  turn  to  Ms.  Cino  for  any  com-
ments she wishes to make. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Stevens follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The Committee will come to order. 
I  thank  the  Committee  for  meeting  on  short  notice  for  today’s  hearing  on  the 

nominations of Maria Cino and Phyllis Scheinberg. 

President  Bush  nominated  Maria  Cino  to  be  Deputy  Secretary  of  Transportation 

on April 6, 2005. 

Her  previous  positions  in  government  include  2  years  as  Assistant  Secretary  of 

Commerce and Director General of the Foreign Commercial Service. 

She  led  the  Administration’s  export  promotion  effort  at  the  Commerce  Depart-
ment.  She  managed  1,700  employees  at  an  agency  with  offices  in  more  than  80 
countries. 

The  President  nominated  Phyllis  Scheinberg  to  be  Assistant  Secretary  of  Trans-

portation on April 14, 2005. 

Ms.  Scheinberg  has  a  distinguished  career  in  federal  service  devoted  to  transpor-
tation  issues.  She  has  served  as  Deputy  Assistant  Secretary  of  DOT,  as  a  director 
of transportation issues at GAO, and as a budget examiner at OMB. 

She  brings  vital  experience  to  a  department  with  enormous  financial  responsibil-
ities,  including  the  aviation  and  highway  trust  funds  and  new  rail  infrastructure 
projects. 

I thank the witnesses for their testimony today.

STATEMENT OF MARIA CINO, DEPUTY

SECRETARY–DESIGNATE, DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Ms.  CINO.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator  Inouye,  and 
Members  of  the  Committee.  It  is  an  honor  for  me  to  appear  before 
you today as President Bush’s nominee to serve as the next Deputy 
Secretary  of  Transportation.  I  would  especially  like  to  thank  Sen-
ator Clinton from my home State of New York for her kind words, 
and  I  would  like  to  thank  my  friend  Senator  Allen,  from  my  now 
home State of Virginia, for his kind words. 

I  am  grateful  to  President  Bush  and  our  Secretary  of  Transpor-
tation,  Norm  Mineta,  for  the  support  of  my  nomination.  I  am  a 
great admirer of Secretary Mineta. He is a statesman in the truest 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

8

sense  of  the  word  and  he  is  incredibly  knowledgeable  and  pas-
sionate about our Nation’s transportation system. 

As the Members of this Committee understand so well, transpor-
tation is the engine that drives the American economy. It is imper-
ative to keep the Department responsible for this vital network op-
erating  at  peak  efficiency  as  we  approach  the  challenging  road 
ahead. 

The Deputy Secretary is the chief operating officer of the Depart-
ment, responsible for seeing this Nation’s vast network of highways 
and railways, seaways, airports, pipelines, and transit systems con-
tinue  to  operate  safely,  reliably,  and  efficiently,  all  the  while  look-
ing  ahead  to  anticipate  and  prepare  for  tomorrow’s  transportation 
demands in an increasingly interconnected world. 

While I could not claim to have Secretary Mineta’s vast expertise 
on  transportation,  what  I  will  be  able  to  bring  to  the  Department 
should I be confirmed is the benefit of nearly 25 years of managing 
and  leading  field-based  operations,  developing  and  adhering  to 
complex budgets, setting short and long-term strategic goals, build-
ing coalitions, developing, motivating, and mentoring staffs. 

Included  in  this  experience  is  an  understanding  of  the  impor-
tance  of  working  with  Members  of  Congress  on  both  sides  of  the 
aisle  and  an  extensive  network  of  contacts  in  federal,  state,  and 
local agencies. During the President’s first term, I had the privilege 
of  being  confirmed  by  the  Senate  for  the  position  of  Assistant  Sec-
retary and Director General of the United States Foreign Commer-
cial Service. In fact, it was 4 years ago almost to the day on which 
I  appeared  here  before  this  Committee  and  the  Committee  on 
Banking, Housing, and Urban Affairs. 

My experience as Director General of the Commercial Service in-
stilled a deep appreciation of the dedicated and compassionate pub-
lic  servants  who  work  for  America.  I  relied  on  their  expertise  and 
advice  to  do  my  job  and  I  believe  that  my  leadership  skills  and 
management strengths helped them to do their jobs. 

At  the  Commercial  Service,  my  job  was  helping  connect  U.S. 
businesses with export opportunities, giving me a firsthand look at 
the  critical  role  of  transportation  networks  in  a  global  economy. 
Transportation  links  were  major  considerations  and  major  factors 
in our success, whether it was the availability of air service to con-
nect  potential  buyers  and  sellers  or  the  entire  intermodal  system 
chain  that  served  as  the  essential  artery  through  which  inter-
national commerce flows. 

I  know  of  no  Department  that  affects  more  people’s  life  as  di-
rectly as Transportation. If confirmed, I look forward to the oppor-
tunity  to  help  this  essential  Department  and  its  employees  con-
tinue to excel and to make sure that the Department invests its re-
sources wisely and well to deliver the infrastructure that will keep 
America and the American economy moving forward. 

Again, I thank you for this opportunity to appear today and I am 

happy to answer any questions. 

[The  prepared  statement  and  biographical  information  of  Ms. 

Cino follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

9

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARIA CINO, DEPUTY SECRETARY-DESIGNATE,

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Thank  you,  Chairman  Stevens,  Senator  Inouye,  and  Members  of  the  Committee. 
It  is  an  honor  for  me  to  appear  before  you  today  as  President  Bush’s  nominee  to 

serve as the next Deputy Secretary of Transportation. 

I am grateful to President Bush and Secretary of Transportation Norm Mineta for 
their  support  of  my  nomination.  I  am  a  great  admirer  of  Secretary  Mineta.  He  is 
a statesman in the truest sense of the word, and he is incredibly knowledgeable and 
passionate about our Nation’s transportation system. 

As  the  Members  of  this  Committee  understand  so  well,  transportation  is  the  en-
gine that drives the American economy. It is imperative to keep the Department re-
sponsible for this vital network operating at peak efficiency as we approach a chal-
lenging road ahead. 

The  Deputy  Secretary  is  the  Chief  Operating  Officer  of  the  Department  respon-
sible  for  seeing  that  this  Nation’s  vast  network  of  highways  and  railways,  our  sea-
ways,  airports,  pipelines,  and  transit  systems  continue  to  operate  safely,  reliably, 
and  efficiently  all  the  while  looking  ahead  to  anticipate  and  prepare  for  tomorrow’s 
transportation demands in an increasingly interconnected world. 

While I cannot claim to have Secretary Mineta’s vast expertise on transportation, 
what I will be able to bring to the Department, should I be confirmed, is the benefit 
of my nearly 25 years of managing and leading field-based organizations; developing 
and adhering to complex budgets; setting short- and long-term strategic goals; build-
ing coalitions; and developing, motivating, and mentoring staffs. 

Included in this experience is an understanding of the importance of working with 
Members  of  Congress  on  both  sides  of  the  aisle,  and  an  extensive  network  of  con-
tacts in federal, state, and local agencies. 

During  the  President’s  first  term,  I  had  the  privilege  of  being  confirmed  by  the 
Senate  for  the  position  of  Assistant  Secretary  and  Director  General  of  the  Depart-
ment  of  Commerce’s  United  States  and  Foreign  Commercial  Service.  This  office  is 
charged  with  export  promotion  and  at  that  time  had  offices  in  85  countries  and  47 
states and 1,700 employees. 

In  fact,  it  was  4  years  ago,  almost  to  the  day,  on  which  I  appeared  before  this 
very  Committee  as  well  as  the  Committee  on  Banking,  Housing  and  Urban  Affairs 
for confirmation hearings for that position. 

My experience as Director General of the Commercial Service instilled a deep ap-
preciation  of  the  dedicated  and  compassionate  public  servants  who  work  for  Amer-
ica. I relied on their expertise and advice to do my job, and I believe that my leader-
ship skills and management strengths helped them to do their jobs better. 

At  the  Commercial  Service,  my  job  was  helping  connect  U.S.  businesses  with  ex-
port  opportunities,  giving  me  a  first-hand  look  at  the  critical  role  of  transportation 
networks in the global economy. 

Transportation links were major considerations, and major factors in our success, 
whether it was the availability of air services to connect potential buyers and sellers 
or  the  entire  intermodal  supply  chain  that  serve  as  the  essential  artery  through 
which international commerce flows. 

I know of no Department that affects more peoples’ lives as directly as Transpor-
tation. If confirmed, I look forward to the opportunity to help this essential Depart-
ment  and  its  employees  continue  to  excel,  and  to  make  sure  that  the  Department 
invests  its  resources  wisely  and  well  to  deliver  the  infrastructure  that  will  keep 
America, and the American economy, moving forward. 

Again,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today,  and  I  will  be 

happy to answer any questions you may have. 

A. BIOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION 

1. Name (Include any former names or nicknames used): Maria Cino. 
2. Position to which nominated: Deputy Secretary for the Department of Transpor-

tation. 

3. Date of Nomination: April 6, 2005. 
4.  Address  (List  current  place  of  residence  and  office  addresses):  Information  not 

released to the public. 

5. Date and Place of Birth: April 19, 1957 in Buffalo, New York. 
6.  Provide  the  name,  position,  and  place  of  employment  for  your  spouse  (if  mar-
ried)  and  the  names  and  ages  of  your  children  (including  stepchildren  and  children 
by a previous marriage): Single, no children 

7. List all college and graduate degrees. Provide year and school attended.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

10

School: St. John Fisher College 
Attended: 1975–1979 
Degree: BA-Political Science 
Degree Granted: May 1979
School: University of Dayton School of Law 
Attended: 1979–1980
Degree: Did not complete. 
Degree Granted: None.

8.  List  all  management-level  jobs  held  and  any  non-managerial  jobs  that  relate 

to the position for which you are nominated.

Republican National Committee 
Deputy Chairman 
June 2003–April 2005
Department of Commerce 
Assistant  Secretary  for  Commerce  and  Director  General  of  the  United  States 
and Foreign Commercial Service 
April 2001– June 2003
Republican National Committee 
Deputy Chairman for Political Operations and Congressional Affairs 
Washington, DC 
May 2000–March 2001
Bush for President, Inc. 
National Political Director 
Austin, TX 
March 1999–April 2000
Wiley, Rein & Fielding 
Government Affairs Consultant 
Washington, DC 
March 1997–March 1999
National Republican Congressional Committee 
Executive Director 
Washington, DC 
January 1993–March 1997
Congressman Bill Paxon 
Chief of Staff 
Washington, DC 
January 1989– January 1993
Paxon for Congress 
Campaign Manager 
West Seneca, NY 
August 1988–December 1988
American View Point 
Research Analyst 
Alexandria, VA 
January 1986– July 1988
Republican National Committee 
Executive Assistant to the Political Director, January 1985– January 1986
State and Local Programs Director, January 1983– January 1985
Program Director, Political Education, July 1981– January 1983
Washington, DC
Bo Sullivan for Governor 
Assistant Research Director 
Bo Sullivan for Governor Committee 
Essex, New Jersey 
January 1981– June 1981

9. List any advisory, consultative, honorary or other part-time service or positions 
with  federal,  state,  or  local  governments,  other  than  those  listed  above,  within  the 
last 5 years.

Department of Commerce 
Senior Advisor 
April 2001– June 2003

10.  List  all  positions  held  as  an  officer,  director,  trustee,  partner,  proprietor, 
agent, representative, or consultant of any corporation, company, firm, partnership, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

or  other  business,  enterprise,  educational  or  other  institution  within  the  last  5 
years.

11

Wish List—Political Group 
Board Member 
1997–1999
VIEW PAC—Political Group 
President 
1997–2000
Enterprise Works—Non-Profit 
Trustee 
1988–2001, resigned 02/01

11.  Please  list  each  membership  you  have  had  during  the  past  10  years  or  cur-
rently hold with any civic, social, charitable, educational, political, professional, fra-
ternal, benevolent or religious organization, private club, or other membership orga-
nization. Include dates of membership and any positions you have held with any or-
ganization. Please note whether any such club or organization restricts membership 
on the basis of sex, race, color, religion, national origin, age or handicap.

National  Republican  Congressional  Committee,  Executive  Director,  1993–1997
Bush for President, Inc., National Political Director, 1999–2000
Republican  National  Committee,  Deputy  Chairman  of  Political  Operations  and 
Congressional Affairs, 2000–2001
Wish List, Board, 1997–1999
VIEW PAC, President, 1997–1999

12.  Have  you  ever  been  a  candidate  for  public  office?  If  so,  indicate  whether  any 
campaign  has  any  outstanding  debt,  the  amount,  and  whether  you  are  personally 
liable for that debt: No. 

13.  Itemize  all  political  contributions  to  any  individual,  campaign  organization, 
political  party,  political  action  committee,  or  similar  entity  of  $500  or  more  for  the 
past 10 years.

Political Contributions: 

VIEW PAC $1,000
Wish List $1,500
Collins for Senate $500
Swift Committee $500
Lazio 2000, Inc. $1,000
Bush for President $2,000

14. List all scholarships, fellowships, honorary degrees, honorary society member-
ships,  military  medals  and  any  other  special  recognition  for  outstanding  service  or 
achievements.

St. John Fisher College—Honorary Doctorate

15.  Please  list  each  book,  article,  column,  or  publication  you  have  authored,  indi-
vidually  or  with  others,  and  any  speeches  that  you  have  given  on  topics  relevant 
to  the  position  for  which  you  have  been  nominated.  Do  not  attach  copies  of  these 
publications unless otherwise instructed.

I  have  not  authored  any  books,  articles,  columns  or  publications.  Speeches  I 
have given over the past decade are related to political updates and the political 
environment. Additionally, while at the Department of Commerce, U.S. Foreign 
Commercial  Service,  I  gave  speeches  promoting  President  Bush’s  Free  Trade 
Agreement and the importance of trade.

16.  Please  identify  each  instance  in  which  you  have  testified  orally  or  in  writing 
before  Congress  in  a  non-governmental  capacity  and  specify  the  subject  matter  of 
each testimony: None. 

B. POTENTIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST 

1.  Describe  all  financial  arrangements,  deferred  compensation  agreements,  and 

other continuing dealings with business associates, clients, or customers: None. 

2.  Do  you  have  any  commitments  or  agreements,  formal  or  informal,  to  maintain 
employment, affiliation or practice with any business, association or other organiza-
tion during your appointment? If so, please explain: None. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

12

3.  Indicate  any  investments,  obligations,  liabilities,  or  other  relationships  which 
could  involve  potential  conflicts  of  interest  in  the  position  to  which  you  have  been 
nominated.

Please  refer  to  the  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation  Office  of  General  Coun-
sel’s Opinion Letter.

4.  Describe  any  business  relationship,  dealing,  or  financial  transaction  which  you 
have had during the last 5 years, whether for yourself, on behalf of a client, or act-
ing  as  an  agent,  that  could  in  any  way  constitute  or  result  in  a  possible  conflict  of 
interest in the position to which you have been nominated: None. 

5. Describe any activity during the past 5 years in which you have been engaged 
for the purpose of directly or indirectly influencing the passage, defeat, or modifica-
tion of any legislation or affecting the administration and execution of law or public 
policy.

While  employed  at  the  Department  of  Commerce,  U.S.  Foreign  &  Commercial 
Service, I promoted President Bush’s Free Trade Agreement and the importance 
of trade.

6.  Explain  how  you  will  resolve  any  potential  conflict  of  interest,  including  any 

that may be disclosed by your responses to the above items.

Please  refer  to  the  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation  Office  of  the  General 
Counsel’s Opinion Letter.

C. LEGAL MATTERS 

1.  Have  you  ever  been  disciplined  or  cited  for  a  breach  of  ethics  by,  or  been  the 
subject of a complaint to any court, administrative agency, professional association, 
disciplinary committee, or other professional group? No. 

2.  Have  you  ever  been  investigated,  arrested,  charged,  or  held  by  any  federal, 
state, or other law enforcement authority of any federal, state, county, or municipal 
entity, other than for a minor traffic offense? No. 

3.  Have  you  or  any  business  of  which  you  are  or  were  an  officer  ever  been  in-
volved  as  a  party  in  an  administrative  agency  proceeding  or  civil  litigation?  If  so, 
please explain.

While  serving  as  Executive  Director  of  the  National  Republican  Congressional 
Committee  (01/1993–03/1997)  and  as  Deputy  Chairman  of  the  Republican  Na-
tional  Committee  (06/2003–04/2005),  complaints  were  lodged  against  the  Com-
mittees by the Federal Election Commission. 
It  is  very  common  to  have  political  organizations  file  complaints  with  the  Fed-
eral  Election  Commission,  especially  during  an  election  year.  The  National  Re-
publican  Congressional  Committee  and  the  Republican  National  Committee, 
likewise file complaints against other political organizations.

4.  Have  you  ever  been  convicted  (including  pleas  of  guilty  or  nolo  contendere )  of 

any criminal violation other than a minor traffic offense? No. 

5.  Please  advise  the  Committee  of  any  additional  information,  favorable  or  unfa-
vorable,  which  you  feel  should  be  disclosed  in  connection  with  your  nomination: 
None. 

6.  Have  you  ever  been  accused,  formally  or  informally,  of  sexual  harassment  or 

discrimination on the basis of sex, race, religion or any other basis? No. 

D. RELATIONSHIP WITH COMMITTEE 

1. Will you ensure that your department/agency complies with deadlines for infor-

mation set by congressional committees? Yes. 

2.  Will  you  ensure  that  your  department/agency  does  whatever  it  can  to  protect 
congressional  witnesses  and  whistle  blowers  from  reprisal  for  their  testimony  and 
disclosures? Yes. 

3.  Will  you  cooperate  in  providing  the  Committee  with  requested  witnesses,  in-
cluding technical experts and career employees, with firsthand knowledge of matters 
of interest to the Committee? Yes. 

4.  Are  you  willing  to  appear  and  testify  before  any  duly  constituted  committee  of 
the  Congress  on  such  occasions  as  you  may  be  reasonably  requested  to  do  so?  Yes.

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Ms. Scheinberg, do you have a statement? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

13

FINANCIAL 

STATEMENT  OF  PHYLLIS  F.  SCHEINBERG,  ASSISTANT
SECRETARY  OF  TRANSPORTATION  FOR  BUDGET  AND
PROGRAMS/CHIEF 
OFFICER–DESIGNATE,
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Ms.  SCHEINBERG.  Yes,  sir.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator 
Inouye, Senator McCain, and Senator Lautenberg. I want to thank 
Senator Allen for his kind introduction. It is an honor for me to ap-
pear  before  you  today,  having  been  selected  by  Secretary  Mineta 
and  President  Bush  for  the  position  of  Assistant  Secretary  for 
Budget  and  Programs  and  Chief  Financial  Officer  of  the  Depart-
ment  of  Transportation.  If  confirmed,  I  look  forward  to  working 
with you closely and this Committee on transportation issues. 

Throughout  almost  26  years  of  federal  service,  I  have  worked  in 
the  area  of  transportation  finance  and  oversight.  During  this  time 
I have come to understand and appreciate the vital role that a safe, 
secure, and dependable transportation system plays in keeping our 
economy strong. I also understand the importance of the Executive 
and  Legislative  branches  working  together  as  a  team  to  improve 
the Nation’s transportation policies, programs, and financing. 

For many years I have worked closely with the Congress and this 
Committee  in  particular.  If  confirmed,  I  look  forward  to  working 
with  all  of  you  as  we  develop  new  solutions  to  our  Nation’s  trans-
portation needs. 

I  recognize  the  significant  investment  American  taxpayers  have 
made in developing, maintaining, and improving our transportation 
system.  That  is  why  as  Assistant  Secretary  and  CFO,  my  top  pri-
ority would be to ensure that our financial investment in transpor-
tation is managed as effectively and efficiently as possible. 

I  am  committed  to  continued  improvement  of  the  processes  and 
systems  needed  to  ensure  proper  oversight  of  the  funds  entrusted 
to  us.  We  have  a  responsibility  to  ensure  that  the  traveling  public 
and  our  business  community  receive  the  greatest  return  on  their 
transportation investment. 

As a career public servant, I am deeply honored to be considered 
for  this  important  position.  Over  the  years,  I  have  seen  firsthand 
the positive benefits that open exchange of information and collabo-
ration can provide in addressing transportation issues. I am proud 
to have dedicated my career to this important mission. 

If  confirmed  as  Assistant  Secretary  and  CFO,  I  pledge  to  work 
closely with the Congress, to be a good steward of American trans-
portation  dollars,  and  to  safeguard  the  financial  resources  of  the 
Department of Transportation. 

Thank  you  again  and  I  look  forward  to  any  questions  you  may 

[The  prepared  statement  and  biographical  information  of  Ms. 

have. 

Scheinberg follows:]

FOR

PREPARED STATEMENT OF PHYLLIS F.  SCHEINBERG,  ASSISTANT SECRETARY OF
FINANCIAL

TRANSPORTATION
OFFICER-DESIGNATE, DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 
Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Inouye  and  Members  of  the  Committee.  It  is 
an honor for me to appear before you today and to have been selected by Secretary 
Mineta  and  President  Bush  for  the  position  of  the  Assistant  Secretary  for  Budget 
and  Programs  and  Chief  Financial  Officer  at  the  Department  of  Transportation.  If 

PROGRAMS/CHIEF

BUDGET

AND

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

14

confirmed, I look forward to working closely with this Committee on transportation 
issues. 

Throughout almost 26 years of federal service, I have worked in the area of trans-
portation  finance  and  oversight.  During  this  time,  I  have  come  to  understand  and 
appreciate  the  vital  role  that  a  safe,  secure,  and  dependable  transportation  system 
plays in keeping our economy strong. I also understand the importance of the Exec-
utive  and  Legislative  Branches  working  together  as  a  team  to  improve  the  nation’s 
transportation  policies,  programs,  and  financing.  For  many  years,  I  have  worked 
closely with the Congress and this Committee, in particular. If confirmed, I look for-
ward to working with all of you as we develop new solutions for our nation’s trans-
portation needs. 

I  recognize  the  significant  investment  American  taxpayers  have  made  in  devel-
oping,  maintaining,  and  improving  transportation.  That  is  why,  as  Assistant  Sec-
retary  and  CFO,  my  top  priority  would  be  to  ensure  that  our  financial  investment 
in  transportation  is  managed  as  effectively  and  efficiently  as  possible.  I  am  com-
mitted  to  continued  improvement  of  the  processes  and  systems  needed  to  ensure 
proper  oversight  of  the  funds  entrusted  to  us.  We  have  a  responsibility  to  ensure 
that  the  traveling  public  and  our  business  community  receive  the  greatest  return 
on their transportation investment. 

As  a  career  public  servant,  I  am  deeply  honored  to  be  considered  for  this  impor-
tant position. Over the years, I have seen first hand the positive benefits that open 
exchange  of  information  and  collaboration  can  provide  in  addressing  transportation 
issues.  I  am  proud  to  have  dedicated  my  career  to  this  important  mission.  If  con-
firmed as Assistant Secretary and CFO, I pledge to work closely with the Congress, 
to  be  a  good  steward  of  American’s  transportation  dollars,  and  to  safeguard  the  fi-
nancial resources of the Department of Transportation. 

A. BIOGRAPHICAL INFORMATION 
1. Name: (Include any former names or nicknames used):

Phyllis Factor Scheinberg 
Phyllis Ann Factor 
Phyllis Turner

2.  Position  to  which  nominated:  Assistant  Secretary  of  Transportation  for  Budget 

and Programs and Chief Financial Officer. 

3. Date of Nomination: April 14, 2005
4, Address: (List current place of residence and office addresses).

Residence: Information not released to the public. 
Office:  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation  400  7th  Street,  SW,  Room  10101 
Washington, DC 20590.

5. Date and Place of Birth: 02/20/48—Everett, Massachusetts. 
6.  Provide  the  name,  position,  and  place  of  employment  for  your  spouse  (if  mar-
ried)  and  the  names  and  ages  of  your  children  (including  stepchildren  and  children 
by a previous marriage):

Husband: David Lee Turner 

Telecommunications Engineer 
U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service 
Fairfax Drive 
Arlington, VA.

Children: 

Dianne Barbra Scheinberg, 30
Eric Lee Turner, 16

7. List all college and graduate degrees. Provide year and school attended.

1974–1979 University of California, Irvine—M.S. 
1965–1969 Simmons College, Boston, MA—B.A.

8.  List  all  management-level  jobs  held  and  any  non-managerial  jobs  that  relate 

to the position for which you are nominated.

04/01–present Deputy Assistant Secretary, DOT, Washington, DC 
07/90–04/01 Director, U.S. General Accounting Office, Washington, DC 
08/81–07/90 Budget Examiner, OMB, Washington, DC 
01/81–08/81 Policy Analyst, FEMA. Washington, DC 
07/79–01/81 Presidential Management Intern, U.S. GPO, Washington, DC

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

15

9. List any advisory, consultative, honorary or other part-time service or positions 
with  federal,  state,  or  local  governments,  other  than  those  listed  above,  within  the 
last 5 years: None. 

10.  List  all  positions  held  as  an  officer,  director,  trustee,  partner,  proprietor, 
agent, representative, or consultant or any corporation, company, firm, partnership, 
or  other  business,  enterprise,  educational  or  other  institution  within  the  last  five 
years.

General Partner, Vista Apartments, Palo Alto, CA.

11.  Please  list  each  membership  you  have  had  during  the  past  10  years  or  cur-
rently hold with any civic, social, charitable, educational, political, professional, fra-
ternal, benevolent or religious organization, private club, or other membership orga-
nization. Include dates of membership and any positions you have held with any or-
ganization. Please note whether any such club or organization restricts membership 
on the basis of sex, race, color, religion, national origin, age or handicap.

Director, American Association for Budget & Policy Analysis 
Falls Church, VA 
(non-profit professional organization, 1995–2000)
Member, Parent Teachers Association at the following Arlington Public Schools 

Jamestown Elementary School (1994–2000) 
Williamsburg Middle School, Arlington, VA (2003–2003) 
Thomas Jefferson High School for Science & Tech, Fairfax, VA (2003–present)

Member, Temple Rodef Shalom, Falls Church, VA, 1982–present
(None of these organizations restricts membership)

12.  Have  you  ever  been  a  candidate  for  public  office?  If  so,  indicate  whether  any 
campaign  has  any  outstanding  debt,  the  amount,  and  whether  you  are  personally 
liable for that debt: No. 

13.  Itemize  all  political  contributions  to  any  individual,  campaign  organization, 
political  party,  political  action  committee,  or  similar  entity  of  $500  or  more  for  the 
past 10 years: None. 

14. List all scholarships, fellowships, honorary degrees, honorary society member-
ships,  military  medals  and  any  other  special  recognition  for  outstanding  service  or 
achievements.

2002 Transportation 9/11 Medal 
2003 Presidential Rank Award of Meritorious Executive

15.  Please  list  each  book,  article,  column,  or  publication  you  have  authored,  indi-
vidually  or  with  others,  and  any  speeches  that  you  have  given  on  topics  relevant 
to  the  position  for  which  you  have  been  nominated.  Do  not  attach  copies  of  these 
publications unless otherwise instructed.

While  at  the  General  Accounting  Office  (currently  the  Government  Account-
ability  Office),  I  authored  or  co-authored  the  following  GAO  Reports  and  Testi-
mony:
03/21/01 Intercity Passenger Rail: Assessing the Benefits of Increased Federal 
Funding  for  Amtrak  and  High-Speed  Passenger  Rail  Systems,  GAO–01–480T.
02/14/01 Highway  Infrastructure:  FHWA’s  Model  for  Estimating  Highway 
Needs Has Been Modified for State-Level Planning, GAO–01–299.
01/31/01 Motor Vehicle Safety: NHTSA’s Ability to Detect and Recall Defective 
Replacement Crash Parts Is Limited, GA0–01–225.
11/17/00 Metropolitan  Washington  Airports  Authority:  Information  on  Con-
tracting at Washington Dulles International Airport and Ronald Reagan Wash-
ington National Airport Between 1992 and 1999, GAO–01–185R.
11/9/00 Mass  Transit:  Review  of  the  South  Boston  Piers  Transit-way  Finance 
Plan, GAO–01–174R.
09/29/00 Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  Decisions  on  the  Future  of  Amtrak  and 
Intercity Passenger Rail Are Approaching, T–RCED–00–277.
09/15/00 Mass  Transit:  Project  Management  Oversight  Benefits  and  Future 
Funding Requirements, RCED–00–221.
08/30/00 Transit  Grants:  Need  for  Improved  Predictability,  Data  and  Moni-
toring in Application Processing, RCED–00–260.
07/31/00 Hazardous  Materials  Training:  DOT  and  Private  Sector  Initiatives 
Generally Complement Each Other, RCED–00–190.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

16

07/17/00 Commercial  Motor  Vehicles:  Effectiveness  of  Actions  Being  Taken  to 
Improve Motor Carrier Safety is Unknown, RCED–00–189.
06/29/00 Highway  Funding:  Problems  With  Highway  Trust  Fund  Information 
Can Affect State Highway Funds, RCED/AIMD–00–148.
06/05/00 Highway  Infrastructure:  FHWA’s  Model  for  Estimating  Highway 
Needs Is Generally Reasonable, Despite Limitations, RCED–00–133.
05/31/00 Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  Amtrak  Will  Continue  to  Have  Difficulty 
Controlling Its Costs and Meeting Capital Needs, RCED–00–138.
05/15/00 Pipeline  Safety:  The  Office  of  Pipeline  Safety  Is  Changing  How  It 
Oversees the Pipeline Industry, RCED–00–128.
04/28/00 Mass  Transit:  Implementation  of  FTA’s  New  Starts  Evaluation  Proc-
ess and FY 2001 Funding Proposals, RCED–00–149.
04/25/00 Transit  Grants:  Department  of  Labor’s  Certification  Process,
T–RCED–00–157.
03/31/00 Mass  Transit:  Review  of  the  Bay  Area  Rapid  Transit  District’s  Air-
port Extension Finance Plan, RCED–00–95R.
03/31/00 Mass  Transit:  Review  of  the  Tren  Urbano  Finance  Plan,  RCED–00–
09R.
03/15/00 Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  Increasing  Amtrak’s  Accountability  for  Its 
Taxpayer Relief Act Funds, T–RCED–00–116.
03/08/00 Mass  Transit:  Challenges  in  Evaluating,  Overseeing,  and  Funding 
Major Transit Projects, T–RCED–00–104.
03/02/00 Commercial  Motor  Vehicles:  Significant  Actions  Remain  to  Improve 
Truck Safety, T–RCED–00–102.
02/29/00 Intercity Passenger Rail: Amtrak Needs to Improve Its Accountability 
for Taxpayer Relief Act Funds, RCED/AIMD–00–78.
10/15/99 Mass  Transit:  Mobility  Improvements  Is  One  of  the  Many  Factors 
Used to Evaluate Mass Transit Projects, RCED–00–6R.
09/27/99 Transportation  Infrastructure:  Better  Data  Needed  to  Rate  the  Na-
tion’s Highway Conditions, RCED–99–264.
09/24/99 Transportation  Infrastructure:  FHWA  Should  Assess  and  Compare 
the  Benefits  of  Projects  When  Awarding  Discretionary  Grants,  RCED–99–263.
08/19/99 Mass Transit: Status of New Starts Transit Projects With Full Fund-
ing Grant Agreements, RCED–99–240.
07/09/99 Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  Amtrak’s  Progress  in  Improving  Its  Finan-
cial Condition Has Been Mixed, RCEC–99–181.
06/23/99 Highway  Safety:  Effectiveness  of  State  .08  Blood  Alcohol  Laws, 
RCED–99–179.
06/09/99 Transportation  Infrastructure:  Impacts  of  Utility  Relocations  on 
Highway and Bridge Projects, RCED–99–131.
06/01/99 Transportation  Infrastructure:  Advantages  and  Disadvantages  of 
Wrap-Up Insurance for Large Construction Projects, RCED–99–155.
04/26/99 Mass  Transit:  FTA’s  Progress  in  Developing  and  Implementing  a 
New Starts Evaluation Process, RCED–99–113.
04/16/99 Railroad  Regulation:  Changes  in  Railroad  Rates  and  Service  Quality 
Since 1990, RCED–99–93.
03/17/99 Truck  Safety:  Effectiveness  of  Motor  Carriers  Office  Hampered  by 
Data  Problems  and  Slow  Progress  on  Implementing  Safety  Initiatives,
T–RCED–99–122.
02/26/99 Railroad  Regulation:  Current  Issues  Associated  With  the  Rate  Relief 
Process, RCED–99–46.
02/23/99 Truck  Safety:  Motor  Carriers  Office’s  Activities  to  Reduce  Fatalities 
Are Likely to Have Little Short-term Effect, T–RCED–99–89.
01/14/99 Surface  Infrastructure:  High-Speed  Rail  Projects  in  the  United 
States, RCED–99–44.
06/05/98 Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  Prospects  for  Amtrak’s  Financial  Viability, 
RCED–98–211R.
05/20/98 Mass  Transit:  FTA’s  New  Starts  Funding  Criteria,  RCED–98–189R.
05/20/98 Rail  Transportation:  Federal  Railroad  Administration’s  Safety  Pro-
grams, T–RCED–98178.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

17

05/19/98 Transportation Infrastructure: Supplemental Information on the Fed-
eral  Highway  Administration’s  Project  Selection  Process  for  Five  Discretionary 
Programs, RCED–98–179R.
05/14/98 Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  Financial  Performance  of  Amtrak’s  Routes, 
RCED–98–151.
04/24/98 Highway  Trust  Fund:  Financial  Condition  as  of  September  30,  1997, 
RCED–98–171R.
04/21/98 Surface  Transportation:  Issues  Associated  With  Pipeline  Regulation 
by the Surface Transportation Board, RCED–98–99.
03/31/98 Surface  Transportation:  Issues  Associated  With  Pipeline  Regulation 
by the Surface Transportation Board, T–RCED–98–127.
03/24/98 Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  Outlook  for  Improving  Amtrak’s  Financial 
Health, T–RCED–98–134.
03/02/98 Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  Issues  Associated  With  a  Possible  Amtrak 
Liquidation, RCED–98–60.
02/27/98 Surface  Transportation:  Improvements  in  the  Bureau  of  Transpor-
tation Statistics’ Commodity Flow Survey, RCED–98–90R.
02/12/98 Surface Infrastructure: Costs, Financing and Schedules for Large-Dol-
lar Transportation Projects, RCED–98–64.
02/06/98 Highway  Trust  Fund:  Possible  Impact  If  It  Had  Financed  All  High-
way Expenditures, RCED–98–78R.
12/19/97 Highway  Safety:  NHTSA’s  Motorcycle  Helmet  Activities,  RCED–97–
44R.
11/21/97 Transportation  Infrastructure:  Highway  Pavement  Design  Guide  Is 
Outdated, RCED–97–9.
11/07/97 Transportation Infrastructure: Review of Project Selection Process for 
Five FHWA Discretionary Programs, RCED–97–14.
11/04/97 Federal  Highway  Programs:  Status  of  Federal  Highway  Programs  in 
the Absence of Reauthorization, T–RCED–97–38.
11/03/97 Commercial  Motor  Carriers:  DOT  is  Shifting  to  Performance-Based 
Standards to Assess Whether Carriers Operate Safely, RCED–97–8.
08/08/97 Commercial  Passenger  Vehicles:  Safety  Inspection  of  Commercial 
Buses and Vans Entering the United States From Mexico, RCED–97–194.
07/23/97 Rail  Transportation:  Federal  Railroad  Administration’s  New  Ap-
proach to Railroad Safety, RCED–97–142.
06/30/97 Federal-Aid  Highway  Program:  Impact  of  the  District  of  Columbia 
Emergency Highway Relief Act, RCED–97–162.
06/25/97 Highway  Safety:  NHTSA’s  Activities  Concerning  State  Motorcycle 
Helmet Laws, RCED–97–185R.
06/05/97 Highway  Funding:  The  Federal  Highway  Administration’s  Funding 
Apportionment Model, RCED–97–159.
05/30/97 Surface  Transportation:  Regional  Distribution  of  Federal  Highway 
Funds, RCED/HEHS–97–167R.
04/29/97 Surface Transportation: States Are Experimenting With Design-Build 
Contracting, RCED–97–138R.
04/23/97 Intercity Passenger Rail: Amtrak’s Financial Crisis Threatens Contin-
ued Viability, T–RCED–97–147.
04/09/97 Commercial  Trucking:  Safety  Concerns  About  Mexican  Trucks  Re-
main Even as Inspection Activity Increases, RCED–97–68.
03/13/97 Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  The  Financial  Viability  of  Amtrak  Con-
tinues to be Threatened, T–RCED–97–94.
03/12/97 Intercity  Passenger  Rail:  Amtrak’s  Financial  Viability  Continues  to 
be Threatened, T–RCED–97–80.
03/06/97 Surface  Transportation:  Prospects  for  Innovation  Through  Research, 
Intelligent  Transportation  Systems,  State  Infrastructure  Banks,  and  Design-
Build Contracting, T–RCED–97–83.
02/28/97 Transportation  Infrastructure:  Managing  the  Costs  of  Large-Dollar 
Highway Projects, RCED–97–47.
02/26/97 Transportation  Infrastructure:  States’  Implementation  of  Transpor-
tation Management Systems, T–RCED–97–79.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

18

01/13/97 Transportation  Infrastructure:  States’  Implementation  of  Transpor-
tation Management Systems, RCED–97–32.
12/04/96 Commuter Rail Service in Wisconsin and Illinois, RCED–99–29R.
10/31/96 State  Infrastructure  Banks:  A  Mechanism  to  Expand  Federal  Trans-
portation Financing, RCED–97–9.
09/17/96 Urban  Transportation:  Metropolitan  Planning  Organizations’  Efforts 
to Meet Federal Planning Requirements, RCED–96–200.
09/06/96 Surface Transportation: Research Funding, Federal Role, and Emerg-
ing Issues, RCED–96–233.
08/30/96 BART Airport Extension Update, RCED–96–246R.
07/26/96 Transportation  Enhancements:  Status  of  the  $2.4  Billion  Authorized 
for Non-motorized Transportation, RCED–96–156.
07/24/96 Amtrak’s Strategic Business Plan: Progress to Date, RCED–964–187.
06/28/96 DC Emergency Highway Relief Act, RCED–96–196–187.
06/27/96 Northeast Rail Corridor: Information on Users, Funding Sources, and 
Expenditures, RCED–96–144.
05/31/96 Mass  Transit:  Actions  Needed  for  the  BART  Airport  Extension, 
RCED–96–176.
04/01/96 Railroad Safety: DOT Faces Challenges in Improving Grade Crossing 
Safety,  Track  Inspection  Standards,  and  Passenger  Car  Safety,  T–RCED–96–
114.
04/01/96 Railroad Safety: DOT Faces Challenges in Improving Grade Crossing 
Safety,  Track  Inspection  Standards,  and  Passenger  Car  Safety  T–RCED–96–
115.
09/07/95 Niagara  Falls  Bridge  Commission:  Audit  of  Capital  Development  Ef-
forts and Selected Financial Practices, RCED–95–92.
08/02/95 Railroad Safety: Status of Efforts to Improve Railroad Crossing Safe-
ty, RCED–95–191.

Testimony  before  the  U.S.  Congress  on  behalf  of  Department  of  Transportation:
05/20/03 Surface  Transportation  Board’s  Budget  before  the  House  Transpor-
tation and Infrastructure Rail Subcommittee.
09/25/03 Innovative Financing of Transportation Infrastructure Projects before 
the Joint Hearing of the Senate Committees on Environment and Public Works 
and Finance.

Speeches

10/27/02 Present  and  Future  of  Core  Federal  Funding  at  the  3rd  National 
Transportation  Finance  Conference  of  the  Transportation  Research  Board  in 
Chicago, Illinois.

16.  Please  identify  each  instance  in  which  you  have  testified  orally  or  in  writing 
before  Congress  in  a  non-governmental  capacity  and  specify  the  subject  matter  of 
each testimony: None 

B. POTENTIAL CONFLICTS OF INTEREST 

1.  Describe  all  financial  arrangements,  deferred  compensation  agreement,  and 

other continuing dealings with business associates, clients, or customers: None. 

2.  Do  you  have  any  commitments  or  agreements,  formal  or  informal,  to  maintain 
employment, affiliation or practice with any business, association or other organiza-
tion during your appointment? No. 

3.  Indicate  any  investments,  obligations,  liabilities,  or  other  relationships  which 
could  involve  potential  conflicts  of  interest  in  the  position  to  which  you  have  been 
nominated.

General Partner–Vista Apartments, Palo Alto, CA. 
Please refer to the opinion letter of the DOT Office of General Counsel.

4.  Describe  any  business  relationship,  dealing,  or  financial  transaction  which  you 
have had during the last 5 years, whether for yourself, on behalf of a client, or act-
ing  as  an  agent,  that  could  in  any  way  constitute  or  result  in  a  possible  conflict  of 
interest in the position to which you have been nominated: None. 

5. Describe any activity during the past 5 years in which you have been engaged 
for the purpose of directly or indirectly influencing the passage, defeat, or modifica-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

19

tion of any legislation or affecting the administration and execution of law or public 
policy: None. 

6.  Explain  how  you  will  resolve  any  potential  conflict  of  interest,  including  any 

that may be disclosed by your respons to the above items.

Please refer to the opinion letter of the DOT Office of General Counsel.

C. LEGAL MATTERS 

1.  Have  you  ever  been  disciplined  or  cited  for  a  breach  of  ethics  by,  or  been  the 
subject of a complaint to any court, administrative agency, professional association, 
disciplinary committee, or other professional group? No. 

2.  Have  you  ever  been  investigated,  arrested,  charged,  or  held  by  any  federal, 
state, or other law enforcement authority of any federal, state, county, or municipal 
entity, other than for a minor traffic offense? No. 

3.  Have  you  or  any  business  of  which  you  are  or  were  an  officer  ever  been  in-

volved as a party in an administrative agency proceeding or civil litigation? No. 

4.  Have  you  ever  been  convicted  (including  pleas  of  guilty  or  nolo  contendere)  of 

any criminal violation other than a minor traffic offense? No. 

5.  Please  advise  the  Committee  of  any  additional  information,  favorable  or  unfa-
vorable,  which  you  feel  should  be  disclosed  in  connection  with  your  nomination: 
None. 

6.  Have  you  ever  been  accused,  formally  or  informally,  of  sexual  harassment  or 

discrimination on the basis of sex, race, religion or any other basis? No. 

D. RELATIONSHIP WITH COMMITTEE 

1. Will you ensure that your department/agency complies with deadlines for infor-

mation set by congressional committees? Yes. 

2.  Will  you  ensure  that  your  department/agency  does  whatever  it  can  to  protect 
congressional  witnesses  and  whistle  blowers  from  reprisal  for  their  testimony  and 
disclosures? Yes. 

3.  Will  you  cooperate  in  providing  the  Committee  with  requested  witnesses,  in-
cluding technical experts and career employees, with firsthand knowledge of matters 
of interest to the Committee? Yes. 

4.  Are  you  willing  to  appear  and  testify  before  any  duly  constituted  committee  of 
the  Congress  on  such  occasions  as  you  may  be  reasonably  requested  to  do  so?  Yes.

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
You both come very highly recommended and I will say that Sec-
retary  Mineta  called  me  personally  over  the  weekend  to  see  if  we 
could schedule this hearing so that he could have the assistance of 
the  two  of  you,  and  urged  that  we  proceed  as  rapidly  as  possible 
because of the problems he faces without the positions that you will 
hold being filled. 

So I want you to know that I read through the background state-
ment  that  each  one  of  you  provided  the  Committee  last  night.  I 
commend  you  on  your  careers  to  date  and  believe  that  you  really 
have  the  background  that  is  necessary,  each  of  you,  for  the  posi-
tions that the President has nominated you to fill. 

I really, in view of what I read last night, do not have any ques-
tions  concerning  that.  Senator  Inouye,  do  you  have  any  questions 
of the ladies? 

Senator  INOUYE.  I  have  just  one  question,  Mr.  Chairman.  A  few 
days  ago  we  conducted  a  hearing  in  which  we  discussed  financing 
for the security operations, TSA and other security operations, and 
we  learned  that  over  90  percent  of  the  funds  available  go  for  one 
purpose,  airlines.  What  are  your  concerns  about  the  other  modes 
of transportation? 

The CHAIRMAN. Ms. Cino? 
Ms.  CINO.  Senator,  I  know,  with  regards  to  security,  that  is  an 
issue  that  we  work  very  closely  with  Homeland  Security  on  and 
they take the lead in developing our strategy and procedures for se-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

20

curity.  I  know  that  we  are  very,  very  fortunate  to  have  the  new 
Deputy  Secretary  of  Homeland  Security,  Michael  Jackson,  who 
served  with  us  at  the  Department  of  Transportation  the  first  2 
years of the Administration. I look forward to working with him to 
do everything we possibly can with regards to ensuring safety and, 
if confirmed, I look forward to working with this Committee to en-
sure that our fellow Americans on transportation modes are secure 
in all that they do. 

Senator INOUYE. One more. Several suggestions have been made 
that  if  we  go  below  $1.3  billion  for  Amtrak  it  would  put  them  on 
the route to bankruptcy. Is there any credence to that? 

Ms.  CINO.  I  think,  Senator,  in  my  conversations  with  the  Sec-
retary,  Secretary  Mineta  is  committed  to  doing  all  he  can  for  Am-
trak,  so  much  so  that  he  has  traveled  around  the  country,  he  has 
met  with  elected  officials,  he  has  met  with  rail  workers,  and  even 
has  had  conversations  with  our  daily  commuters,  those  folks  that 
use the rail system. 

With regards to that, I know that the Secretary and the Adminis-
tration  are  committed  to  saving  Amtrak  with  the  fundamental 
changes  and  the  reforms  that  will  be  necessary  to  see  this  entity 
go on. If confirmed, I look forward to working with this Committee 
to make sure that we have a bill that we can enact and the Presi-
dent will sign. 

In  addition,  I  think  we  have  already  made  some  good  progress 
with regards to having proposals. We have the Administration pro-
posal,  obviously,  but  in  addition  Amtrak  presented  last  week  their 
proposal,  and  I  believe  that  last  week  we  were  also  encouraged  by 
Senator  Lott  in  expressing  his  desire  to  have  a  bipartisan  bill  in 
the next couple of weeks. 

Again,  we  look  forward  to  making  sure,  both  the  Administration 
and  Secretary  Mineta,  that  we  are  able  to  save  Amtrak  with  the 
fundamental changes and the reforms that we think are necessary. 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much, Ms. Cino. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator McCain. 
Senator MCCAIN. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. I again want to con-
gratulate both the nominees. We are pleased at your willingness to 
serve in these very, very difficult times. 

As far as Amtrak is concerned, Ms. Cino and Ms. Scheinberg, we 
are going to continue to pump money in and it is going to continue 
to  fail  and  things  are  going  to  happen  as  this  latest  failure  of  the 
Acela  trains  because,  as  we  all  know,  rushed  into  service,  billions 
of dollars, taxpayers’ dollars, will be spent. 

The  Administration  proposal,  Ms.  Cino,  is  good.  The  President’s 
proposal  is  very  good  for  Amtrak.  Will  it  happen?  Probably  not, 
probably  not.  But  I  applaud  the  President’s  courage  in  saying 
something has got to be done. 

Very  few  benefits  of  old  age  that  I  have  found,  but  one  of  them 
is to remember when heads, presidents of Amtrak, came before this 
Committee  and  said:  We  are  on  a  glide  path  to  financial  solvency; 
do  not  worry  because  we  have  got  this  new  train;  and  let  us  con-
tinue to subsidize these long distance rail services which lose hun-
dreds  of  dollars  per  passenger.  And  Members  of  this  Committee 
continue  to  strongly  support  money-losing  propositions  when  less 
than 1 percent of the passengers in America ride on railroads. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

21

Billions  and  billions  of  the  taxpayers’  money  will  continue  to  be 
spent  frivolously  and  outrageously.  Yes,  I  believe  that  we  need  a 
Northeastern Corridor of rail and I have strongly supported it. But 
to  support  the  so-called  Sunset  Limited  that  I  believe  is  a  $105  or 
$205  per  passenger  subsidy—I  still  remember  the  great  story  in 
the New York Times Magazine about the guy that rode it one time, 
and  finally  ended  up  taking  a  bus  for  the  last  quarter  of  the  trip. 
So  we  will  continue  to  pump  money  into  Amtrak.  We  will  con-
tinue to lose, to subsidize money-losing routes, and the taxpayer is 
the  one  that  is  going  to  suffer.  This  latest  Acela  thing  is  one  in  a 
long  series  of  Amtrak  difficulties  that  have  cost  the  taxpayers  bil-
lions  of  dollars,  and  again  after  being  assured  time  after  time  by 
then-heads  of  Amtrak  that  everybody  is  fine  and  that  everything 
is going to be just fine. 

So  I  applaud  the  President’s  courage  in  coming  forward  with  an 
initiative  that  at  least  will  educate  the  American  people.  Will  it 
pass  the  Congress?  No.  But  I  certainly  do  applaud  the  President’s 
courage in saying we have got to do something about this dramati-
cally  money-losing  enterprise  that  was  designed  years  ago  to  be 
turned over to the private sector after just a few years, which prob-
ably will not be in my lifetime. 

One  other  area  I  wanted  to  discuss  with  you  is,  I  was  in  the 
Phoenix  airport  yesterday  preparing  to  fly  back  to  Washington. 
There was a security brief, and we all paused for a period of time. 
The  thing  that  is  most  disappointing  to  me  about  TSA  is  that  to 
my knowledge since we organized TSA and the security procedures 
at  airports  I  have  not  seen  one  single  technological  advance  as  far 
as passengers are concerned. There should be a better way of mov-
ing  people  through  airports,  and  that  is  obviously  through  tech-
nology. 

Hardly  a  day  goes  by  that  somebody—that  I  do  not  get  a  letter 
from  some  small  business  or  medium  size  business  or  large  cor-
poration  that  says:  Look,  we  have  got  some  technology  here  that 
we  think  will  enhance  security  and  expedite  people  moving  in  and 
out  of  airports.  You  have  got  to  start  looking  at  this  technology  so 
that  we  can  remove  the  almost  permanent  gridlock  that  we  see  in 
major airports across America today. 

I admire and respect TSA employees, but it is not manpower that 

is going to do it; it is technology. 

Finally,  Ms.  Scheinberg,  I  want  to  especially  thank  you  for  the 
great  work  you  did  at  GAO.  You  were  honest  and  straightforward 
and I hope none of those candid and honest opinions you gave will 
impede your nomination for this position. 

I  want  to  congratulate  the  family  members  and  friends  of  both 
of the nominees who are here today. I know it is a very proud time 
for you. 

Would  you  want  to  respond  to  that  diatribe,  Ms.  Cino  or  Ms. 

Scheinberg? 

Ms. CINO. Senator, I have not been at the Department very long, 
but  I  think  I  will  reserve  the  right  to  take  your  comments  and 
bring them back to the Department. 

Ms. SCHEINBERG. Senator, I agree with you that we need to work 
on technology and we at the Department of Transportation, includ-
ing  Secretary  Mineta  who  very  strongly  believes  the  same,  will  be 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

22

working  with  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  on  these 
issues. 

Senator MCCAIN. Well, I thank you. 
Mr. Chairman, thank you. I again want to say that I believe that 
technology is out there and there seems to be, at least in the opin-
ion  of  those  who  are  trying  to  at  least  give  serious  consideration 
for  these  technologies,  kind  of  a  bureaucratic  gridlock,  that  if  we 
do  nothing  then  we  have  not  made  a  mistake,  and  therefore  the 
status quo is fine. 

The  status  quo  at  airports  is  not  fine,  as  you  know,  particularly 
in  the  major  airports  around  America.  I  in  a  way  am  a  little  bit 
surprised  at  the  incredible  patience  and  good  humor  that  most 
Americans  show  as  they  are  required  to  take  off  their  shoes,  their 
bracelet,  their  jacket.  I  think  it  is  a  testimony  to  the  willingness 
of the American people, but I think it is harmful to our airlines and 
I  think  it  is  harmful  to  our  ability  to  transport  people  from  one 
place to another throughout America. 

I congratulate both of you. We look forward to working with you 

and thank you for your willingness to serve. 

Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Ms. CINO. Thank you, Senator. 
Ms. SCHEINBERG. Thank you, Senator. 
The CHAIRMAN. Before I yield to Senator Lautenberg, let me say 
that  this  afternoon  we  have  a  hearing  scheduled  at  2  p.m.  At  that 
time,  if  we  have  a  quorum  I  will  ask  consent  to  report  these  two 
nominations, with the hopes that we might be able to get them con-
firmed before the recess that starts on Friday. 

I have also just been called to the floor, so I hope that I can leave 
this in your gentle hands, Senator Inouye. I think Senator McCain 
is leaving. So am I. I yield to Senator Lautenberg. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. All of us are veterans, all four of us, so as 
a  consequence  we  know  how  to  deal  with  one  another  in  guarded 
fashion. 

The CHAIRMAN. Very guarded. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Mr. Chairman. 
I am sorry that Senator McCain had to go because I was pleased 
to  hear  him  make  a  commitment  that  we  are  going  to  keep  pump-
ing  money  into  Amtrak.  That  was  very  nice  of  him  to  make  that 
kind of a suggestion. 

The fact of the matter is that in my view Amtrak is essential and 
I am sure that each of you is aware of the fact that the entire avia-
tion  system  shut  down  on  9/11  and  the  only  thing  that  was  oper-
ating with any degree of reliability was Amtrak. So how in this day 
and age of security consciousness can we decide to cut out this one 
important mode of transportation? 

Twenty-five  million  people  rode  Amtrak  last  year,  Senator 
Inouye, and we continue to hope that we are going to make Amtrak 
finally  what  it  is  supposed  to  be.  That  includes  government  sub-
sidy. There is not a country in the world that has a reasonably de-
cent operation on passenger rail that does not subsidize it in some 
way. Even in the UK, where they turned much of it over to private 
hands,  now  it  gets  more  subsidy  than  it  did  before,  except  that  it 
passes  through  one  stage  where  people  can  take  off  a  few  pennies 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

23

before,  a  few  pence,  whatever  they  call  it  there,  before  it  goes  to-
wards moving passengers. 

I wanted to point out something else. We have a service that we 
call Essential Air Service. It is designed to keep communities from 
being so isolated that transportation in and out is very difficult. It 
costs  as  much  as  $200  per  passenger  for  every  passenger  that  is 
included on an Essential Air Service route. And contrary to the im-
pressions that my distinguished colleague had about promises that 
were made by chiefs of Amtrak that the railroad would soon be on 
a glide path to fiscal sustainability, I do not remember, and I have 
been  here  a  long  time—I  know  I  just  look  like  a  freshman,  but  I 
have  been  here  a  long  time.  The  fact  of  the  matter  is  that  we  had 
statements  from  heads  of  the  railroad  who  said  we  cannot  ever  do 
the capital financing that we need and meet our operating require-
ments. It just cannot be done. 

So  when  we  look  at  the  costs,  Mr.  Co-Chairman,  Acting  Chair-
man—and  I  wish  you  permanent  chairmanship—the  fact  of  the 
matter is that rail service cannot be done without recognizing that 
a  subsidy  is  necessary.  I  hope  that  the  President  can  realize  this 
fact. 

Do either of you share a different view than I do about the essen-
tiality of Amtrak? How about Buffalo, Ms. Cino? It is a very impor-
tant city on our northern border—and I know the places, not quite 
as  well  perhaps  as  Senator  Clinton,  but  Binghampton,  Rochester. 
What  would  reliable,  relatively  high  speed  service  mean  to  a  city 
like Buffalo or other cities that are isolated like that? 

Ms.  CINO.  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator.  With  regards  to  Am-
trak and the rail service, but in particular with regards to Amtrak, 
I  know  that  smarter  people  than  I  have  been  talking  about  this 
issue  for  the  last  35  years.  But  I  must  say  in  the  last  12  days, 
working  days  that  I  have  actually  been  at  the  Department  of 
Transportation, I have probably spent 10 full days working on Am-
trak and rail issues. So while I am not quite up to speed, I feel that 
I have had a pretty good lesson over the last 12 days. 

With  regards  to  Amtrak,  I  believe  again  that  the  Secretary  is 
committed, the Administration is committed, to saving Amtrak, but 
looking  for  some  of  the  reforms  that  have  been  talked  about  both 
in  the  Amtrak  bill  and  certainly  I  think  perhaps  even  by  Senator 
Lott with regards to making sure that we preserve the rail system, 
but  again  incorporate  the  reforms  to  help  us  become  more  solvent 
and sound. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Ms.  Scheinberg,  do  you  with  your  budget 

experience have any views on what we do about Amtrak? 

Ms.  SCHEINBERG.  Yes,  Senator  Lautenberg.  I  totally  agree  with 
you,  and  the  Secretary  and  the  President  agree  with  you,  that  we 
cannot  have  an  intercity  passenger  rail  system  in  this  country 
without federal support. It makes sense that the federal support be 
for  capital  investment,  as  it  is  with  highways  and  airports.  The 
Federal  Government  supports  capital  investment,  and  the  state 
and local governments support the operations of the mode of trans-
portation.  That  is  a  cornerstone  of  the  President’s  reform  package. 
I know the Secretary has said that with reform will come money, 
will  come  financing.  But  at  the  moment  the  system  that  we  have 
is broken. For over 30 years we have been providing money to Am-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

24

trak  and  it  is  actually  having  more  and  more  problems.  What  we 
are trying to do with the President’s proposal is to reform the sys-
tem so that we can spend our federal dollars wisely and have a bet-
ter intercity passenger rail system. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  I  can  see  that  Secretary  Mineta  has 
had  a  chance  to  impart  his  wisdom  and  knowledge  to  each  of  you. 
The  words  are  not  really  comforting,  though  they  are  nicely  said 
by  intelligent  people.  When  they  talk  about  reform  around  here 
now, it usually refers to turning a government function over to pri-
vate  hands.  Well,  I  remind  everybody  that  Amtrak  was  in  private 
hands  until  the  government  was  forced  to  take  it  over,  with  bank-
ruptcies being the spur to move these things. 

So if we look at what has happened, we took the airport security 
screeners away from private hands because the airlines did such a 
poor  job,  and  now  we  are  talking  about  going  to  perhaps  privatize 
the screeners once again. 

I  think,  Mr.  Chairman,  that’s  part  of  what  causes  enormous 
delay  is  the  search  for  the  tiniest  scissor  or  tweezer  or  things  of 
that nature. I believe that this is a conspiracy by the scissor manu-
facturers  to  make  sure  that  they  confiscate  your  scissors  so  that 
you can go out and buy new ones. 

But it is an outrageous thing, when the cockpit doors are already 
sealed.  I  think  we  ought  to  be  looking  at  requiring  installation  of 
a  cabin  camera  viewed  in  the  cockpit,  and  if  someone  sees  some-
body  holding  a  cabin  attendant  with  something  at  their  throat  to 
be  suspicious  and  maybe  do  something  about  it.  Instead,  we  con-
tinue  to  proceed  with  this  incredible  search  and  this  humiliation 
that  goes  with  taking  off  your  shoes,  especially  if  you  have  got 
holes  in  your  socks.  It  is  not  nice,  not  for  Senators  anyway.  If  the 
administration  would  fund  less-intrusive  screening  technology, 
travellers wouldn’t be so inconvenienced. 

But  we  have  to  look  at  these  things  and  see  what  they  really 
mean. If it makes travellers safer, we have got to do it. But a con-
stant  reminder  that  terrorists  are  looking  over  our  shoulder  is  not 
particularly  good  for  the  morale  of  the  country.  Many  people  are 
frustrated,  disgusted,  and  annoyed.  I  had  talked  with  Secretary 
Chertoff yesterday and they are looking at the possibility of avoid-
ing  this  senseless  search  for  a  little  pair  of  scissors  that  do  not 
mean  anything  when  you  still  have  a  plastic  knife.  Some  airlines, 
by  the  way,  give  you  metal  knives  and  some  use  only  plastic 
knives.  Now,  I  do  not  think  that  one  airline  cares  more  about  its 
passengers  than  the  other,  so  I’d  like  to  know  the  government’s 
role in providing guidance on this topic. 

In  any  event,  I  am  pleased  to  see  the  two  of  you  willing  to  take 
on the assignments before you, that the Chairman and other Mem-
bers  of  the  Committee  are  anxious  to  have  your  confirmation  in 
place. I will join them. 

I  have  many  questions  and  will  submit  them  for  the  record.  I 
would  ask  in  closing  if  we  could  get  statistics  on  what  happened 
while the mandatory universal motorcycle helmet law was in place. 
I  was  the  author  of  that,  and  I  know  that  we  in  our  hospitals  in 
New  Jersey  had  a  reduction  in  neck,  head  and  neck  trauma  as  a 
result.  The  federal  requirement  was  repealed  a  couple  of  years 
later, at the urging of people who wanted to be freer, one of whom 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

25

had  a  terrific  motorcycle  accident,  Senator  Ben  Nighthorse  Camp-
bell, at a later time. 

So  if  you  could  supply  that  for  me  it  would  be  helpful,  and  I 

thank you both for again your willingness to serve. 

Mr. Chairman, I thank you very much. 
Senator  INOUYE.  [presiding]  Thank  you  very  much,  Senator.  I 
also  join  my  Chairman  in  congratulating  the  ladies  for  your  spirit 
of public service. We thank you very much. 

Like Chairman Stevens, I received a call from Secretary Mineta. 
He must think very highly of you, ladies. He called me up just be-
fore  I  went  to  bed.  He  was  really  at  work.  So  we  will  do  our  best 
to expedite your confirmation and do not be surprised if you are in 
your positions tomorrow. 

Ms. CINO. Thank you very much. 
Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much. 
[Whereupon, at 10:48 a.m., the Committee was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

MARIA CINO 

Amtrak 

Question. As Deputy Secretary, will you take on the role as the representative for 
the  Secretary  on  Amtrak’s  Board  as  some  of  your  predecessors  have?  What  do  you 
believe  should  be  the  qualifications  of  Amtrak  Board  members?  Do  you  believe  the 
President and CEO of Amtrak should be a voting member of the Board? 

Answer.  The  decision  by  the  Secretary  to  serve  on  the  Amtrak  Board  himself  or 
to  assign  a  representative  is  his  alone,  but  I  would  be  pleased  to  take  on  this  role 
if he requested it. 

The Amtrak Reform and Accountability Act of 1997 directed that Board members 
‘‘have  technical  qualifications,  professional  standing,  and  demonstrated  expertise  in 
the  fields  of  transportation  or  corporate  or  financial  management.’’  President  Bush 
and Secretary Mineta have taken this direction seriously and have nominated indi-
viduals  whose  backgrounds  meet  these  criteria.  The  Act  also  named  the  Amtrak 
President  and  CEO  an  ex  officio  member  of  the  Board.  The  President’s  reform  pro-
posal,  which  I  support,  does  not  seek  to  change  either  of  these  Congressional  man-
dates. 
Airport Improvement Program/Facilities and Equipment 

Question. The Administration has proposed dramatic cuts to the Airport Improve-
ment  Program  (AIP)  and  the  Facilities  and  Equipment  (F&E)  program  in  FY  2006. 
Over  the  past  two  years  these  programs  have  been  cut  by  more  than  $1  billion 
below their authorized levels. 

Are  you  concerned  that  this  year’s  planned  $500  million  cut  in  AIP  will  create 
problematic  formula  adjustments  that  will  essentially  shut  many  of  the  nation’s 
smallest airports out of the funding equation? What do you propose as the most ef-
fective solution for the Federal Government to meet the needs of all of our nation’s 
airports? 

Does  the  Administration  plan  to  continue  cutting  the  F&E  account  in  future 
years?  What  will  the  effect  of  the  current  proposal  be  on  efforts  to  modernize  the 
national airspace system? 

Answer.  I  understand  that  the  President’s  FY  2006  budget  specifically  proposes 
legislative language to preserve the entitlement grants for the nation’s smallest air-
ports.  Further,  the  President’s  budget  also  suggests  a  minimum  amount  of  money 
for AIP discretionary funds to allow FAA to target projects of highest priority. FAA 
believes this will further enable the agency to support the needs of the smaller air-
ports in the system. 

I have been reassured by FAA that the slight reduction in the FY 2006 Facilities 
and  Equipment  budget  will  not  affect  the  FAA’s  modernization  plans  or  delay 
projects  that  directly  contribute  to  FAA’s  strategic  safety  and  capacity  goals.  Obvi-
ously,  I  cannot  predict  future  levels  of  F&E  funding,  but  if  confirmed,  I  will  work 
closely with Secretary Mineta, the Committee on Commerce, Science and Transpor-
tation  and  the  FAA  to  ensure  that  adequate  funds  are  budgeted  to  allow  the  FAA 
to  move  forward  with  modernization  projects  that  are  critical  to  the  national  air-
space system. 
Automated Flight Service Stations 

Question.  The  Nation’s  Automated  Flight  Service  Stations  (AFSS)  were  recently 
contracted out through the A–76 process. There have been some indications that an-
ticipated  savings  over  the  first  5  years  of  the  contract  are  far  smaller  than  indi-
cated. 

Can you provide a detailed update of the status of the AFSS contract? Do you sup-
port  using  the  A–76  process  on  other  components  of  the  nation’s  air  traffic  control 
system? 

(27)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

28

Answer.  On  February  1,  2005,  the  FAA  awarded  a  contract  to  Lockheed  Martin 
for  the  services  provided  to  general  aviation  pilots  through  a  network  of  58  Auto-
mated Flight Service Stations located in the continental United States, Puerto Rico 
and  Hawaii.  Three  new  Hubs  will  be  built  in  Leesburg,  Virginia;  Ft.  Worth,  Texas; 
and  Prescott,  Arizona.  Seventeen  other  existing  facilities  will  be  refurbished  and 
continue  operation.  Thirty-eight  facilities  will  be  closed.  The  FAA  has  told  me  that 
the  estimated  savings  from  this  contract  substantially  exceed  the  required  A–76  $1 
billion  level  and  that  the  process  was  supported  by  general  aviation  pilots  that  use 
these services. 

I understand that Secretary Mineta designated air traffic control a ‘‘core function’’ 
of  the  FAA  and  therefore  not  subject  to  competitive  sourcing.  I  am  not  aware  that 
this issue is being revisited at the Department. 
Maritime—Title XI 

Question. The Title XI ship financing program has recently undergone significant 
reforms to meet Congressionally mandated recommendations. Yet the financial safe-
guards the IG has imposed above and beyond GAO and Congressional requirements, 
has  lead  to  excessive  oversight,  redundant  reviews,  and  unpredictable  bureaucratic 
red tape by the newly formed Credit Council. 

How  do  you  intend  to  revitalize  Title  XI  to  focus  the  expertise  of  the  Maritime 
Administration and the Department’s limited resources to make this program func-
tional once again? 

Answer.  It  is  my  understanding  that  the  Credit  Council  was  created  to  provide 
overarching  credit  policy  direction  for  all  of  the  Department’s  credit  programs.  As 
with  the  implementation  of  any  new  process,  the  Secretary  views  the  new  credit 
process  as  a  work  in  progress,  which  will  be  modified  as  needed  to  incorporate  fu-
ture refinements over time. 

With  the  obligation  of  Title  XI  subsidy  for  the  Hawaii  Superferry  project,  I  am 
told that there are effectively no subsidy funds available for new Title XI loan guar-
antees. Consistent with the Administration’s intent to eliminate corporate subsidies, 
the President’s FY 2006 Budget did not request subsidy funds for new Title XI loan 
guarantees.  Thus,  the  Department’s  main  focus  is  ensuring  that  the  Maritime  Ad-
ministration  has  the  tools  it  needs  to  manage  the  outstanding  Title  XI  portfolio  ef-
fectively. 
Maritime—Port Infrastructure Development/SEA–21 Initiative 

Question. Secretary Mineta has repeatedly and openly discussed the Department’s 
proposed Sea Transportation Efficiency Act of the 21st Century Act (SEA–21) in nu-
merous speeches throughout the country. I know the Marine Transportation System 
National  Advisory  Council  (MTSNAC)  presented  their  recommendations  to  Sec-
retary  Mineta  in  November  of  2003  and  the  Secretary  has  since  proposed  his  rec-
ommendation to the White House. 

With our country woefully lacking in a comprehensive federal policy for port infra-
structure  development,  given  the  expected  doubling  of  growth  over  the  next  fifteen 
years,  how  does  the  department  plan  to  address  these  significant  shortcomings  in 
our Nation’s transportation systems? 

Answer.  Secretary  Mineta  believes  that  a  comprehensive  marine  transportation 
system  improvement  initiative  would  enhance  the  nation’s  overall  transportation 
system, and he has asked his staff to undertake a comprehensive review of the ma-
rine  transportation  system  and  develop  a  package  of  recommendations.  The  Sec-
retary has also successfully advocated for the creation of an Interagency Committee 
on the Marine Transportation System—a cabinet-level committee that he will chair. 
The Secretary’s ultimate goal in developing a ‘‘SEA–21’’ proposal is to deliver a ma-
rine  transportation  system  that  enhances  the  efficiency,  productivity,  and  capacity 
of our nation’s intermodal transportation system. 

If  confirmed,  I  look  forward  to  working  closely  with  the  Secretary  and  Members 
of the Committee on Commerce, Science and Transportation to ensure that our mar-
itime system is a vibrant piece of our national transportation network. 
Maritime—Review of Title XI Applications 

Question.  The  National  Defense  Authorization  Act  for  Fiscal  Year  2004  (Pub.  L. 
108–36)  has  a  statutory  provision  for  independent  reviews  of  Title  XI  applications. 
The  Committee  report  accompanying  the  legislation  makes  clear  that  Congress  did 
not intend for this authority to be used in ‘‘routine cases or where MARAD already 
has sufficient expertise to assess full the risk or approving a loan guarantee applica-
tion.’’

In  view  of  clear  Congressional  intent,  why  is  MARAD  required  to  obtain  inde-
pendent  reviews  from  applications  that  appear  to  be  routine  or  clearly  within 
MARAD’s expertise? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

29

Answer.  I  have  been  assured  that  MARAD  is  not  required  to  obtain  independent 
reviews  of  Title  XI  applications  that  would  be  counter  to  the  guidance  provided  in 
the  Conference  Report  accompanying  the  2004  DoD  Authorization  Act.  To  date, 
there  has  been  only  one  Title  XI  application—Hawaii  Superferry—for  which  an  ex-
ternal advisor has been retained. Although I was not here at the time, I have been 
told  that  MARAD  proposed—and  the  Department  agreed—that  an  external  advisor 
should be retained in that case, because the project involved an applicant with less 
than 5 years operating experience and service in a new market. 
Maritime—Credit Council Review of Title XI Applications 

Question.  It  is  my  understanding  that  Title  XI  applications  go  through  three  dif-
ferent  reviews  before  they  are  presented  to  the  Credit  Council.  This  seems  to  be 
very redundant and an inefficient use of government resources. 

In this era of serious personnel constraints, how is this duplication of efforts justi-

fied? 

Answer. It is my understanding that the reviews that occur prior to an application 
being presented to the DOT Credit Council are concurrent and are done with exist-
ing Department personnel. In light of past concerns expressed by Congress and the 
findings  and  recommendations  of  the  DOT  Inspector  General  and  the  Government 
Accountability  Office,  the  Department  believes  that  these  different  reviews  are  an 
important  part  of  the  Department’s  due  diligence  in  the  review  of  Title  XI  applica-
tions.  If  confirmed,  I  will  look  for  ways  to  refine  the  Department’s  evaluation  proc-
ess  and  will  certainly  be  open  to  suggestions  from  the  Congress  for  improvements 
in the process. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

PHYLLIS F. SCHEINBERG 

Amtrak—Funding Stream 

Question.  Most  of  our  federal  capital  grant  programs  for  transportation  feature 
some sort of dedicated, multi-year, guaranteed funding stream. Experts widely agree 
that  the  stability  provided  by  such  dedicated  funding  is  essential  for  the  develop-
ment of a successful large-scale transportation program. 

As Assistant Secretary for Budget and Chief Financial Officer for the Department, 
will you support the creation of a dedicated, multi-year, guaranteed funding stream 
for intercity passenger rail and Amtrak? If so, how should this be structured? 

Answer. The President’s legislative proposal to restructure intercity passenger rail 
transportation  in  the  U.S.  would  establish  a  permanent  federal  grant  program  for 
capital  projects  to  public  entities  that  decide  on  infrastructure  investments.  This 
proposed  authorization  is  structured  to  parallel  the  existing  capital  assistance  pro-
gram for public transit new starts projects. 

The  transit  grant  system  is  based  on  a  full  funding  grant  agreement  (FFGA)  be-
tween the Federal Government and the local public project sponsor. The FFGA iden-
tifies the total cost of the project and the federal and local funding shares. The fund-
ing for transit capital projects comes from the transit portion of the Highway Trust 
Fund.  The  funding  source  for  the  proposed  intercity  passenger  rail  infrastructure 
grants has not been identified. 

If  confirmed,  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  to  use  the  transit  model  as  a 
possible example in reforming the process and funding of federal grants for intercity 
passenger rail infrastructure projects. 
FAA Cost Accounting 

Question.  What  is  the  status  of  the  Federal  Aviation  Administration’s  (FAA)  cost 
accounting system methodology? What do you hope to gain from it when it is devel-
oped? 

Answer.  As  of  April  2005,  FAA  has  provided  cost  accounting  information  for  all 
of  its  FY  2004  data  and  for  the  first  quarter  of  FY  2005  for  two  of  its  four  lines 
of  business.  FAA  plans  to  have  Cost  Accounting  in  place  throughout  the  agency  by 
June  2006.  It  should  be  noted  that  FAA  has  implemented  a  labor  distribution  re-
porting  process  where  over  43,000  employees  now  report  their  time  by  project  and 
task. 

To  help  stress  the  importance  of  finance,  FAA  has  revamped  its  executive  and 
management  training  to  include  a  focus  on  improved  financial  accountability.  FAA 
is  committed  to  completing  the  implementation  of  the  Cost  Accounting  System  and 
if confirmed, it would be my expectation that FAA would use this valuable financial 
information in making business decisions. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

30

One  example  of  where  that  is  already  being  done  is  in  the  Air  Traffic  Organiza-
tion,  which  is  establishing  unit  cost  metrics  to  help  drive  efficiencies  within  the  or-
ganization.  The  recently  published  ATO  Annual  Performance  Report  to  Congress 
noted that FY 2004 costs per flight fell an estimated $17. The support for this num-
ber came directly from the FAA Cost Accounting System.

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  14:53 Jan 17, 2006 Jkt 025226 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\25226.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

